assets/javascript/tinymce/plugins/spellchecker/dicts/es_ES.aff
SFX  er indonos er
SFX  er indoos er
SFX  er indote er
SFX  enir inindome enir
SFX  enir inindonos enir
SFX  enir inindoos enir
SFX  enir inindote enir
SFX  entir intindome entir
SFX  entir intindonos entir
SFX  entir intindoos entir
SFX  entir intindote entir
SFX  eir indome eir
SFX  eir indonos eir
SFX  eir indoos eir
SFX  eir indote eir
SFX  er indome ver
SFX  er indonos ver
SFX  er indoos ver
SFX  er indote ver
SFX  erir irindome erir
SFX  erir irindonos erir
SFX  erir irindoos erir
SFX  erir irindote erir
SFX  ertir irtindome ertir
SFX  ertir irtindonos ertir
SFX  ertir irtindoos ertir
SFX  ertir irtindote ertir
SFX  ervir irvindome ervir
SFX  ervir irvindonos ervir
SFX  ervir irvindoos ervir
SFX  ervir irvindote ervir
SFX  er yndome aer
SFX  er yndonos aer
SFX  er yndoos aer
SFX  er yndote aer
SFX  estir istindome estir
SFX  estir istindonos estir
SFX  estir istindoos estir
SFX  estir istindote estir
SFX  etir itindome etir
SFX  etir itindonos etir
SFX  etir itindoos etir
SFX  etir itindote etir
SFX  ir yndome uir
SFX  ir yndonos uir
SFX  ir yndoos uir
SFX  ir yndote uir
SFX  orir urindome orir
SFX  orir urindonos orir
SFX  orir urindoos orir
SFX  orir urindote orir
SFX  ormir urmindome ormir
SFX  ormir urmindonos ormir
SFX  ormir urmindoos ormir
SFX  ormir urmindote ormir
SFX  r ndome ucir
SFX  r ndonos ucir
SFX  r ndoos ucir
SFX  r ndote ucir

SFX  Y 135
SFX  abar bate abar
SFX  r os r
SFX  acar cate acar
SFX  achar chate achar
SFX  aciar ciate aciar
SFX  adar date adar
SFX  agar gate agar
SFX  ajar jate ajar
SFX  alar late alar
SFX  allar llate allar
SFX  almar lmate almar
SFX  altar ltate altar
SFX  alvar lvate alvar
SFX  alzar lzate alzar
SFX  amar mate amar
SFX  ambiar mbiate ambiar
SFX  anar nate anar
SFX  ancar ncate ancar
SFX  anchar nchate anchar
SFX  andar ndate andar
SFX  angar ngate angar
SFX  antar ntate antar
SFX  anzar nzate anzar
SFX  aar ate aar
SFX  apar pate apar
SFX  arar rate arar
SFX  arcar rcate arcar
SFX  archar rchate archar
SFX  ardar rdate ardar
SFX  argar rgate argar
SFX  arrar rrate arrar
SFX  artar rtate artar
SFX  artir rtete artir
SFX  asar sate asar
SFX  ascar scate ascar
SFX  asmar smate asmar
SFX  astar state astar
SFX  astrar strate astrar
SFX  atar tate atar
SFX  avar vate avar
SFX  azar zate azar
SFX  ear ate ear
SFX  ecar cate ecar
SFX  echar chate echar
SFX  edar date edar
SFX  egar gate egar
SFX  eger gete eger
SFX  eglar glate eglar
SFX  egrar grate egrar
SFX  einar inate einar
SFX  ejar jate ejar
SFX  elar late elar
SFX  enar nate enar
SFX  encer ncete encer
SFX  entar ntate entar
SFX  entrar ntrate entrar
SFX  ear ate ear
SFX  erar rate erar
SFX  ercar rcate ercar
SFX  ergir rgete ergir
SFX  ervar rvate ervar
SFX  esar sate esar
SFX  esgar sgate esgar
SFX  estar state estar
SFX  eter tete eter
SFX  evar vate evar
SFX  ever vete ever
SFX  ibrar brate ibrar
SFX  icar cate icar
SFX  idar date idar
SFX  idir dete idir
SFX  igar gate igar
SFX  igir gete igir
SFX  ignar gnate ignar
SFX  ijar jate ijar
SFX  ilar late ilar
SFX  illar llate illar
SFX  imar mate imar
SFX  impiar mpiate impiar
SFX  inar nate inar
SFX  incar ncate incar
SFX  ingar ngate ingar
SFX  intar ntate intar
SFX  irar rate irar
SFX  ir os ir
SFX  istar state istar
SFX  itar tate itar
SFX  itir tete itir
SFX  izar zate izar
SFX  iznar znate iznar
SFX  obar bate obar
SFX  ocar cate ocar
SFX  ochar chate ochar
SFX  odar date odar
SFX  oder dete oder
SFX  ogar gate ogar
SFX  oger gete oger
SFX  ojar jate ojar
SFX  olar late olar
SFX  ollar llate ollar
SFX  omar mate omar
SFX  omer mete omer
SFX  omprar mprate omprar
SFX  onar nate onar
SFX  oncharse nchate onchar
SFX  onder ndete onder
SFX  ontar ntate ontar
SFX  orar rate orar
SFX  ormar rmate ormar
SFX  ornar rnate ornar
SFX  orrar rrate orrar
SFX  orrer rrete orrer
SFX  ortar rtate ortar
SFX  oyar yate oyar
SFX  ubir bete ubir
SFX  ubrir brete ubrir
SFX  ucarse cate ucar
SFX  uchar chate uchar
SFX  udar date udar
SFX  udir dete udir
SFX  udrir drete udrir
SFX  ufar fate ufar
SFX  ugiar giate ugiar
SFX  ulpar lpate ulpar
SFX  umar mate umar
SFX  umbar mbate umbar
SFX  umbrar mbrate umbrar
SFX  undir ndete undir
SFX  untar ntate untar
SFX  upar pate upar
SFX  urar rate urar
SFX  urlar rlate urlar
SFX  uscar scate uscar
SFX  ustar state ustar
SFX  ustrar strate ustrar

SFX  Y 30
SFX  aer ete aer
SFX  r os [^i]r
SFX  ecer cete ecer
SFX  egar igate egar
SFX  ender indete ender
SFX  entar intate entar
SFX  erder irdete erder
SFX  errar irrate errar
SFX  ertar irtate ertar
SFX  esar isate esar
SFX  iar ate iar
SFX  islar slate islar
SFX  obar ubate obar
SFX  ocer cete ocer
SFX  olar ulate olar
SFX  olcar ulcate olcar
SFX  oldar uldate oldar
SFX  olgar ulgate olgar
SFX  oltar ultate oltar
SFX  olver ulvete olver
SFX  onar unate onar
SFX  ontar untate ontar
SFX  ordar urdate ordar
SFX  orzar urzate orzar
SFX  ostar ustate ostar
SFX  ostrar ustrate ostrar
SFX  over uvete over
SFX  uar ate uar
SFX  unir nete unir
SFX  ir os ir

SFX  Y 17
SFX  aer ete aer
SFX  r os [^i]r
SFX  aler lete aler
SFX  cer zte cer
SFX  edir dete edir
SFX  ir os ir
SFX  eguir guete eguir
SFX  er ete er
SFX  entir intete entir
SFX  er te ner
SFX  ertir irtete ertir
SFX  ervir rvete ervir
SFX  estir stete estir
SFX  ir te enir
SFX  orir urete orir
SFX  ormir urmete ormir
SFX  r te ver

SFX  Y 253
SFX  abar bense abar
SFX  abar bese abar
SFX  ar monos [^cgz]ar
SFX  ablar blense ablar
SFX  ablar blese ablar
SFX  acar quense acar
SFX  acar quese acar
SFX  car qumonos car
SFX  achar chense achar
SFX  achar chese achar
SFX  adar dense adar
SFX  adar dese adar
SFX  adrar drense adrar
SFX  adrar drese adrar
SFX  agar guense agar
SFX  agar guese agar
SFX  ar umonos gar
SFX  ajar jense ajar
SFX  ajar jese ajar
SFX  alar lense alar
SFX  alar lese alar
SFX  allar llense allar
SFX  allar llese allar
SFX  almar lmense almar
SFX  almar lmese almar
SFX  altar ltense altar
SFX  altar ltese altar
SFX  alvar lvense alvar
SFX  alvar lvese alvar
SFX  alzar lcense alzar
SFX  alzar lcese alzar
SFX  zar cmonos zar
SFX  amar mense amar
SFX  amar mese amar
SFX  ambiar mbiense ambiar
SFX  ambiar mbiese ambiar
SFX  anar nense anar
SFX  anar nese anar
SFX  ancar nquense ancar
SFX  ancar nquese ancar
SFX  antar ntense antar
SFX  antar ntese antar
SFX  anzar ncense anzar
SFX  anzar ncese anzar
SFX  aar ense aar
SFX  aar ese aar
SFX  apar pense apar
SFX  apar pese apar
SFX  arar rense arar
SFX  arar rese arar
SFX  arcar rquense arcar
SFX  arcar rquese arcar
SFX  archar rchense archar
SFX  archar rchese archar
SFX  ardar rdense ardar
SFX  ardar rdese ardar
SFX  argar rguense argar
SFX  argar rguese argar
SFX  arrar rrense arrar
SFX  arrar rrese arrar
SFX  artar rtense artar
SFX  artar rtese artar
SFX  asar sense asar
SFX  asar sese asar
SFX  ascar squense ascar
SFX  ascar squese ascar
SFX  asgar sguense asgar
SFX  asgar sguese asgar
SFX  asmar smense asmar
SFX  asmar smese asmar
SFX  astar stense astar
SFX  astar stese astar
SFX  atar tense atar
SFX  atar tese atar
SFX  atir tanse atir
SFX  atir tase atir
SFX  ir monos [^g]ir
SFX  avar vense avar
SFX  avar vese avar
SFX  azar cense azar
SFX  azar cese azar
SFX  ear ense ear
SFX  ear ese ear
SFX  ecar quense ecar
SFX  ecar quese ecar
SFX  echar chense echar
SFX  echar chese echar
SFX  eciar ciense eciar
SFX  eciar ciese eciar
SFX  edar dense edar
SFX  edar dese edar
SFX  eer anse eer
SFX  eer ase eer
SFX  er monos [^cg]er
SFX  egar guense egar
SFX  egar guese egar
SFX  eger janse eger
SFX  eger jase eger
SFX  ger jmonos ger
SFX  eglar glense eglar
SFX  eglar glese eglar
SFX  egrar grense egrar
SFX  egrar grese egrar
SFX  eitar itense eitar
SFX  eitar itese eitar
SFX  ejar jense ejar
SFX  ejar jese ejar
SFX  enar nense enar
SFX  enar nese enar
SFX  encer nzanse encer
SFX  encer nzase encer
SFX  cer zmonos cer
SFX  ender ndanse ender
SFX  ender ndase ender
SFX  entar ntense entar
SFX  entar ntese entar
SFX  entrar ntrense entrar
SFX  entrar ntrese entrar
SFX  ear ense ear
SFX  ear ese ear
SFX  erar rense erar
